Arkansas, session 2025, HB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-808, concerning the Arkansas Traveling
Teacher Program, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(i) An agreement for traveling teacher services under this section is
not governed by or subject to the provisions of The Teacher Fair Dismissal
Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2610 is amended to read as follows:
6-15-2610. Construction with other state law.
To the extent that the provisions of this subchapter or the terms of an
approved Rewarding Excellence in Achievement Program plan directly conflict
with any provision of § 6-17-201 et seq., The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of
2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq., or the provisions of any other state law relating
to the compensation of public school teachers, the provisions of this
subchapter and the approved Rewarding Excellence in Achievement Program plan
shall control.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2804(a), concerning requirements for
*TNL004*
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
schools that are designated as schools of innovation, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(12) Adhere to The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-17-
3001 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-17-204(c)(2)(B)(ii), concerning personnel
policies incorporated into teachers' contracts, is amended to read as
follows:
(ii)(a) A provision that states that due to the
policy change, each continuing employee under contract shall have the power
to unilaterally exercise the power of rescission within a period of thirty
(30) days after the school district board of directors takes final action by
providing to the school district board of directors a notice of rescission in
the form of a letter of resignation during the period of thirty (30) days.
(b) For continuing contract employees covered
under The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq., the power
of rescission in this section shall be in addition to the power of rescission
provided under § 6-17-3006.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-17-812(b)(3), concerning agreements
entered into by teachers to receive compensation for teaching more than the
maximum number of students permitted, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(C) The provisions of The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of
2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq., do not apply to an agreement entered into between
a teacher and a school district under this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2807(g) and (h), concerning a teacher
placed in intensive support status under the Teacher Excellence and Support
System, are amended to read as follows:
(g)(1)(A) Upon review and approval of the documentation, the
superintendent may recommend termination or nonrenewal of the teacher's
contract.
(B) A recommendation for termination or nonrenewal of a
teacher's contract under this section shall be made pursuant to the authority
granted to a superintendent for recommending termination or nonrenewal under
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq.
(2)(A) When a superintendent makes a recommendation for
termination or nonrenewal of a teacher's contract under this section, the
public school shall provide a written notice to the teacher.
(B) A notice shall meet the minimum requirements under The
Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq., but is exempt from
the provisions of § 6-17-3004(b).
(3)(A) If the a public school has substantially complied with
the requirements of this section, the public school is entitled to a
rebuttable presumption that the public school has a substantive basis for the
termination or nonrenewal of the teacher's contract under the applicable
standard for termination or nonrenewal under The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act
of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq.
(B) The presumption may be rebutted by the teacher during
an appeal under The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq.
(h) This section does not preclude a public school superintendent
from:
(1) Making a recommendation for the termination or nonrenewal of
a teacher's contract for any lawful reason under The Teacher Fair Dismissal
Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et seq.; or
(2) Including in a recommendation for termination or nonrenewal
of a teacher's contract under this section any other lawful reason for
termination or nonrenewal under The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-
17-3001 et seq.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 30 — The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025

6-17-3001. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Teacher Fair
Dismissal Act of 2025”.

6-17-3002. Definitions.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Probationary teacher” means a teacher who has not
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
completed three (3) successive years of employment in the public school
district in which the teacher is currently employed.
(B)(i) A teacher employed in a public school district in
this state for at least three (3) years shall be deemed to have completed the
probationary period.
(ii) However, by a majority vote of its directors,
an employing public school district may provide for one (1) additional year
of probationary status; and
(2) “Teacher” means any person, exclusive of the public school
district superintendent or assistant superintendent, employed in an Arkansas
public school district who is required to hold a teaching license from the
State Board of Education as a condition of employment.
(b) A teacher who has completed three (3) successive years of
employment in the school district in which the teacher is employed on July 4,
2025, or a teacher who has been given credit for a prior service in another
public school district as authorized by subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this
section, is deemed to have completed the required probationary period.

6-17-3003. Construction.
(a) The General Assembly finds that the:
(1) Current standard, which requires cause that is not
arbitrary, capricious, or discriminatory for the nonrenewal, termination, or
suspension of a teacher, should be raised to a standard of just and
reasonable cause; and
(2) Current standard for compliance with this subchapter and a
public school district's personnel policies of strict compliance should be
lowered to substantial compliance.
(b) This subchapter is not a teacher tenure law in that it does not
confer lifetime appointment of teachers.
(c) A nonrenewal, termination, suspension, or other disciplinary
action by a public school district shall be void unless the public school
district substantially complies with all provisions of this subchapter and
the public school district's applicable personnel policies.

6-17-3004. Evaluation — Effect.
(a) Each teacher employed by a board of directors of a public school
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
district shall be evaluated in writing under the Teacher Excellence and
Support System, § 6-17-2801 et seq.
(b) At a time other than an evaluation conducted under the Teacher
Excellence and Support System, § 6-17-2801 et seq., if a public school
district superintendent or other public school administrator charged with the
supervision of a teacher believes or has reason to believe that the teacher
is having difficulties or problems meeting the expectations of the public
school district or its administration and the administrator believes or has
reason to believe that the problems could lead to termination or nonrenewal
of contract, the public school district superintendent or other public school
administrator shall:
(1) In writing, bring the problems and difficulties to the
attention of the teacher involved; and
(2) Document the efforts that have been undertaken to assist the
teacher to correct whatever appears to be the cause for potential termination
or nonrenewal.

6-17-3005. Teacher personnel file.
(a) A public school district shall maintain a personnel file for each
teacher that shall be available to the teacher for inspection and copying at
the teacher's expense during normal office hours.
(b) A teacher may submit for inclusion in his or her personnel file
written information in response to any of the material contained in the
personnel file.

6-17-3006. Contract renewal — Notice of nonrenewal — Rescission.
(a) Each contract of employment made between a teacher and a public
school district board of directors shall be renewed in writing on the same
terms and for the same salary, unless increased or decreased by law, for the
next school year succeeding the date of termination fixed therein.
(b) A renewal of a contract of employment made between a teacher and a
public school district board of directors may be made by an endorsement on
the existing contract instrument unless:
(1) By May 1 of the contract year, the teacher is notified by
the public school district superintendent that the public school district
superintendent is recommending that the teacher's contract not be renewed;
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
(2) During the period of the contract or within ten (10)
calendar days after the end of the school year, a teacher sends by certified
or registered mail to the president, vice president, or secretary of the
public school district board of directors, with a copy provided to the public
school district superintendent, or delivers in person to the president, vice
president, or secretary of the public school district board of directors,
with a copy provided to the public school district superintendent, his or her
resignation as a teacher; or
(3) The contract is superseded by another contract between the
parties.
(c)(1) Termination, nonrenewal, or suspension shall be only upon the
recommendation of the public school district superintendent.
(2)(A) A notice of nonrenewal shall be delivered in person to a
teacher or mailed by registered or certified mail to a teacher at the
teacher's resident address as reflected in the teacher's personnel file.
(B) The notice of recommended nonrenewal of a teacher
shall include a statement of the reasons for the recommendation, setting
forth the reasons in separately numbered paragraphs so that a reasonable
teacher can prepare a defense.
(d)(1) A teacher shall not be required to sign and return a contract
for the next school year any sooner than thirty (30) days after the contract
is issued to the teacher.
(2) A teacher may unilaterally rescind any signed contract no
later than ten (10) days after the end of the school year.

6-17-3007. Notice of termination recommendation.
(a) A teacher may be terminated only during the term of a contract:
(1) When there is a reduction in force created by districtwide
reduction in licensed staff;
(2) For incompetent performance;
(3) For conduct that materially interferes with the continued
performance of the teacher's duties;
(4) For repeated or material neglect of duty; or
(5) For other just and reasonable cause.
(b) A public school district superintendent:
(1) Shall notify a teacher of a recommendation for termination
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
of the teacher; and
(2)(A) May notify a public school resource officer assigned to
the public school campus on which the teacher is employed of the
recommendation for termination of the teacher.
(B)(i) A public school district superintendent shall not
disclose any additional details regarding a recommendation for termination of
a teacher to a public school resource officer assigned to the public school
campus on which the teacher is employed unless the public school district
superintendent, in his or her discretion and based on relevant information,
believes there are risks to:
(a) Campus security; and
(b) Student safety.
(ii) Additional details regarding a recommendation
for termination of the teacher include without limitation:
(a) The underlying reasons for a
recommendation for termination of the teacher;
(b) The identity of other individuals involved
in a recommendation for termination of the teacher, including without
limitation other teachers, students, administrators employed at or attending
the public school campus where the teacher is employed, and parents or legal
guardians of students attending the public school campus where the teacher is
employed; and
(c) Further disciplinary actions taken against
the teacher in addition to the recommendation for termination of the teacher.
(C) If a public school district superintendent determines
that disclosure of additional details regarding a recommendation for
termination of teacher is necessary under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, the public school district superintendent shall limit the disclosure
of the additional details to the minimum amount of information that he or she
believes is necessary for the public school resource officer assigned to the
public school campus on which the teacher is employed to ensure campus
security and student safety.
(c)(1) A notice for termination shall include a statement of the
reasons for the recommendation of termination, setting forth the reasons in
separately numbered paragraphs so that a reasonable teacher can prepare a
defense.
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
(2) A notice shall be delivered in person to the teacher or sent
by registered or certified mail to the teacher at the teacher's resident
address as reflected in the teacher's personnel file.

6-17-3008. Suspension.
(a) If a public school district superintendent has reason to believe
that cause exists for the termination of a teacher and that immediate
suspension of the teacher is necessary, the public school district
superintendent may suspend the teacher without notice or a hearing.
(b) A public school district superintendent:
(1) Shall notify a teacher of the suspension in writing within
two (2) school days of the suspension; and
(2)(A) May notify a public school resource officer assigned to
the public school campus on which the teacher is employed of the teacher's
suspension.
(B)(i) A public school district superintendent shall not
disclose any additional details regarding a suspension of the teacher to a
public school resource officer assigned to the public school campus on which
the teacher is employed unless the public school district superintendent, in
his or her discretion and based on relevant information, believes there are
risks to:
(a) Campus security; and
(b) Student safety.
(ii) Additional details regarding the suspension of
the teacher include without limitation:
(a) The underlying reasons for the suspension
of the teacher;
(b) The identity of other individuals involved
in the suspension of the teacher, including without limitation other
teachers, students, administrators employed at or attending the public school
campus where the teacher is employed, and parents or legal guardians of
students attending the public school campus where the teacher is employed;
and
(c) Further disciplinary actions taken against
a teacher in addition to the suspension, unless the further disciplinary
actions include a recommendation for the termination of the teacher.
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
(C) If a public school district superintendent determines
that disclosure of additional details regarding the suspension of a teacher
is necessary under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section, the public school
district superintendent shall limit the disclosure of the additional details
to the minimum amount of information that he or she believes is necessary for
the public school resource officer assigned to the public school campus on
which the teacher is employed to ensure campus security and student safety.
(c)(1) A written notice shall include a statement of the reasons for
suspension or recommended termination, setting forth the reasons in
separately numbered paragraphs so that a reasonable teacher can prepare a
defense.
(2) The written notice shall be delivered in person to the
teacher or sent by registered or certified mail to the teacher at the
teacher's residence address as reflected in the teacher's personnel file and
shall state that a hearing before the public school district board of
directors is available to the teacher upon request provided that the request
is made in writing within the time provided in § 6-17-3009.
(d) A hearing shall be scheduled by the president, vice president, or
secretary of the public school district board of directors and the teacher
and shall be held within the time and manner provided in § 6-17-3009 after a
request for the hearing is received by the public school district board of
directors.
(e) If sufficient grounds for termination or suspension are found, a
public school district board of directors may terminate a teacher or continue
the suspension for a definite period of time.
(f) The salary of a suspended teacher shall cease as of the date the
public school district board of directors sustains the suspension.
(g) If sufficient grounds for termination or suspension are not found,
a teacher shall be reinstated without loss of compensation.

6-17-3009. Hearing.
(a) A teacher who receives a notice of recommended termination or
nonrenewal may file a written request with the public school district board
of directors for a hearing.
(b) A written request for a hearing shall be sent by certified or
registered mail to the president, vice president, or secretary of the public
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
school district board of directors, with a copy provided to the public school
district superintendent, or may be delivered in person by the teacher to the
president, vice president, or secretary of the public school district board
of directors, with a copy provided to the public school district
superintendent, within thirty (30) calendar days after the written notice of
proposed termination or nonrenewal is received by the teacher.
(c) Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, a public school district
board of directors shall grant a hearing in accordance with the following
provisions:
(1) The hearing shall take place at a time agreed upon in
writing by the parties, but if no time can be agreed upon, then the hearing
shall be held no fewer than five (5) calendar days nor more than twenty (20)
calendar days after the written request has been received by the public
school district board of directors;
(2)(A) The hearing shall be private unless the teacher or the
public school district board of directors request that the hearing be public.
(B) If the hearing is public, the parent or legal guardian
of any student under eighteen (18) years of age who offers testimony may
elect to have the student's testimony offered in private;
(3) The teacher and the public school district board of
directors may be represented by representatives of their choosing;
(4) A full record of the proceedings at the hearing shall be
made and preserved only if:
(A) The public school district board of directors elect to
make and preserve a record of the hearing at its own expense, in which event
a copy shall be furnished the teacher, upon request, without cost to the
teacher; or
(B) A written request is filed with the public school
district board of directors by the teacher at least twenty-four (24) hours
before the time set for the hearing, in which event the board of directors
shall make and preserve at its own expense a record of the hearing and shall
furnish a transcript to the teacher without cost; and
(5) The public school district board of directors shall not
consider at the hearing any new reasons which were not specified in the
notices required by this subchapter.
(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude a public school district
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
that officially recognizes in its policies an organization representing the
majority of the teachers of the public school district for the purpose of
negotiating personnel policies, salaries, and educational matters of mutual
concern under a written policy agreement from conducting a single nonrenewal
hearing when all the public school district's teachers are recommended for
nonrenewal provided that each teacher at such hearing shall be given an
opportunity to make comments to be included in the hearing record.

6-17-3010. Board action on termination or nonrenewal — Appeal.
(a)(1) Upon conclusion of its hearing with respect to the termination
or nonrenewal of a contract of a teacher who has been employed as a full-time
teacher by the public school district for less than three (3) continuous
years, a public school district board of directors shall take action on the
recommendations by the public school district superintendent with respect to
the termination or nonrenewal of the teacher's contract.
(2) A public school district board of directors' decision on the
nonrenewal of a probationary teacher shall be final.
(b)(1) A licensed teacher who has been employed continuously by the
public school district three (3) or more years or who may have achieved
nonprobationary status pursuant to § 6-17-3002 may be terminated or the
public school district board of directors may refuse to renew the contract of
the teacher only:
(A) When there is a reduction in force created by
districtwide reduction in licensed personnel;
(B) For incompetent performance;
(C) For conduct that materially interferes with the
continued performance of the teacher's duties;
(D) For repeated or material neglect of duty; or
(E) For other just and reasonable cause.
(2)(A) Upon completion of a hearing, a public school district
board of directors, within ten (10) days after the hearing, shall:
(i) Uphold the recommendation of the public school
district superintendent to terminate or not renew the teacher's contract;
(ii) Reject or modify the public school district
superintendent's recommendation to terminate or not renew the teacher's
contract; or
01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
(iii) Vote to continue the contract of the teacher
under such restrictions, limitations, or assurances as the public school
district board of directors may deem to be in the best interest of the public
school district.
(B) A decision shall be reached by a public school
district board of directors within ten (10) days from the date of the
hearing, and a copy of the decision shall be furnished in writing to the
teacher involved, either by personally delivering it to the teacher or by
mailing it by registered or certified mail to the teacher's resident address
as reflected in the teacher's personnel file.
(c) Following a hearing granted to a teacher, a public school district
board of directors, by majority vote, shall make specific written conclusions
with regard to the truth of each reason provided to the teacher in support of
the recommended termination or nonrenewal.
(d)(1) The exclusive remedy for any nonprobationary teacher aggrieved
by a decision made by a public school district board of directors shall be an
appeal to the circuit court of the county in which the public school district
is located, within seventy-five (75) days of the date of written notice of
the action of the board of directors.
(2) Additional testimony and evidence may be introduced on
appeal to show facts and circumstances showing that the termination or
nonrenewal was lawful or unlawful.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 6-20-1909(a)(5), concerning powers of the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education with respect to public
school districts in fiscal distress, is amended to read as follows:
(5) Waive the application of Arkansas law or the corresponding
State Board of Education rules, with the exception of:
(A) Special education programs as provided in this title;
(B) Criminal background checks for employees as provided
in this title; and
(C) Health and safety codes as established by the State
Board of Education and local governmental entities; and
(D) The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et
seq.;

01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1025
SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 6-21-811(g)(6), concerning steps the
Division of Public School Academic Facilities and Transportation may take
when a public school district is classified as being in facilities distress
under the Academic Facilities Distress Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(6) Waive the application of Arkansas law or the corresponding
State Board of Education or commission rules, with the exception of:
(A) Special education programs as provided in this title;
(B) Conducting criminal background checks for employees as
provided in this title; and
(C) Health and safety codes as established by the state
board, the commission, and local governmental entities; and
(D) The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 2025, § 6-17-3001 et
seq.;

/s/McGruder




















01-16-2025 15:18:02 TNL004